Washington statutes.
RCW 18.140.230

Real estate appraiser commission—Establishment—Composition.

There is established the real estate appraiser commission of the state of Washington, consisting of seven members who shall act to give advice to the director.

(1) The seven commission members shall be appointed by the director in the following manner: For a term of six years each, with the exception of the first appointees who shall be the incumbent members of the predecessor real estate appraiser advisory committee to serve for the duration of their current terms, with all other subsequent appointees to be appointed for a six-year term.

(2) At least two of the commission members shall be selected from the area of the state east of the Cascade mountain range and at least two of the commission members shall be selected from the area of the state west of the Cascade mountain range. At least two members of the commission shall be certified general real estate appraisers, at least two members of the commission shall be certified residential real estate appraisers, and at least one member of the commission may be a licensed real estate appraiser, all pursuant to this chapter. No certified or licensed appraiser commission member shall be appointed who has not been certified and/or licensed pursuant to this chapter for less than ten years, except that this experience duration shall be not less than five years only for any commission member taking office before January 1, 2003. One member shall be an employee of a financial institution as defined in this chapter whose duties are concerned with real estate appraisal management and policy. One member shall be an individual engaged in mass appraisal whose duties are concerned with ad valorem appraisal management and policy and who is licensed or certified under this chapter. One member may be a member of the general public.

(3) The members of the commission annually shall elect their chairperson and vice chairperson to serve for a term of one calendar year. A majority of the members of said commission shall at all times constitute a quorum.

(4) Any vacancy on the commission shall be filled by appointment by the director for the unexpired term.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 44; 2005 c 339 s 19; 2000 c 249 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 21: See note following RCW 72.23.025.